Massachusetts, session 194th, H4805.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section C-2-3 of article 2 of the charter of the town of 
Plainville, which is on file in the office of the archivist of the commonwealth, as provided in 
section 12 of chapter 43B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out the first 
sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- There shall be a finance 
committee appointed by the select board chair, finance committee chair and the town moderator 
of such a number of members and for such a term of years in the manner set forth in the town by-
laws.  
SECTION 2. Subsection (d) of section C-3-1 of article 3 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section C-3-2 of said article 3 of said charter is hereby 
amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- Members of the select board shall be ineligible to 
serve in any other elected position established by this charter or by-law. Members of the select 

of 8 14 board shall be ineligible to serve on multi-member bodies established by this charter or by by-
law to which the select board is the appointing authority, except where such appointment 
anticipates that the board member will represent the select board on such multiple-member body.  
SECTION 4. The last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection (b) of said section C-
3-2 of said article 3 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out the words “town 
administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 5. Said subsection (b) of said section C-3-2 of said article 3 of said charter is 
hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph.  
SECTION 6. The second sentence of subsection (b) of section C-3-10 of said article 3 of 
said charter is hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in 
place thereof the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 7. Article 4 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out the title and 
inserting in place thereof the following title:- TOWN MANAGER.  
SECTION 8. Section C-4-1 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby amended by striking 
out the title and inserting in place thereof the following title:- TOWN MANAGER.  
SECTION 9. Said section C-4-1 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby further 
amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-   
(a) There shall be a town manager appointed by the select board with the powers and 
duties set forth in this charter. The town manager shall have the appropriate education, training 
and administrative experience and shall have not less than 3 years of experience in public 

of 8 35 administration: (i) as a city or town administrator; (ii) as an assistant city or town administrator; 
or (iii) in a position with substantially similar functions to a city or town administrator or an 
assistant city or town administrator. The town manager shall receive compensation for services 
as determined by the select board within the amount appropriated for such purposes.  
SECTION 10. Subsection (b) of said section C-4-1 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 11. The first sentence of subsection (c) of said section C-4-1 of said article 4 
of said charter is hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in 
place thereof the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 12. Subsection (a) of section C-4-2 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 13. Subsection (b) of said section C-4-2 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 14. Subsection (c) of said section C-4-2 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  

of 8 54  SECTION 15. Subsection (a) of section C-4-3 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 16. Subsection (a) of section C-4-4 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 17. Subsection (b) of said section C-4-4 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 18. Subsection (c) of said section C-4-4 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 19. The first paragraph of section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 20. Clause (a) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 21. Clause (b) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  

of 8 75  SECTION 22. Clause (c) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 23. Clause (d) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 24. Clause (g) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 25. Clause (i) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 26. Clause (j) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 27. Clause (l) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- town manager.  
SECTION 28. Clause (m) of said section C-4-5 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  

of 8 96  SECTION 29. Section C-5-2 of article 5 of said charter is hereby amended by striking out 
subsections (a) and (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsections:-  
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the select board may 
appoint not more than 2 associate or alternate members to each multi-member body elected 
100 under this charter, other than the school committee and the housing authority, or otherwise 
101 authorized by the General Laws. The alternate or associate members shall be appointed for a 
102 term of 1 year. Alternate or associate members may participate in any and all matters pending 
103 before such body.    
104  (b) The chairman of each multi-member body may designate an associate or alternate 
105 member to temporarily sit as a full member on the multiple-member body in the event of 
106 absence, inability to act or conflict of interest in the part of any member of the body or in the 
107 event of a vacancy on the body.  
108  SECTION 30. The first sentence of subsection (a) of section C-5-4 of said article 5 of 
109 said charter is hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in 
110 place thereof the following words:- town manager.  
111  SECTION 31. Subsection (b) of said section C-5-4 of said article 5 of said charter is 
112 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
113 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
114  SECTION 32. The first sentence of section C-6-2 of article 6 of said charter is hereby 
115 amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
116 following words:- town manager.  

of 8 117  SECTION 33. Section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is hereby amended by 
118 striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-   
119  (a) The select board, in collaboration with the town manager, finance director and finance 
120 committee chair, shall issue a written directive to department heads outlining the overarching 
121 principles and priorities to guide in the preparation of budget requests for the next fiscal year.  
122  SECTION 34. Subsection (b) of said section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is 
123 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator”, each time they appear, and 
124 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- town manager.  
125  SECTION 35. Subsection (c) of said section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is 
126 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
127 following words:- town manager.  
128  SECTION 36. Subsection (d) of said section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is 
129 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
130 following words:- town manager.  
131  SECTION 37. Subsection (e) of said section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is 
132 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
133 following words:- town manager.  
134  SECTION 38. Subsection (f) of said section C-6-3 of said article 6 of said charter is 
135 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
136 following words:- town manager.  

of 8 137  SECTION 39. The first sentence of section C-6-4 of said article 6 of said charter is 
138 hereby amended by striking out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the 
139 following words:- town manager.  
140  SECTION 40. Section 3 of chapter 310 of the acts of 2020 is hereby amended by striking 
141 out the words “town administrator” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- town 
142 manager.  
143  SECTION 41. This act shall take effect upon its passage.